Utah statutes.
38-1-13.   Parties -- Joinder -- Intervention.

Lienors not contesting the claims of each other may join as plaintiffs, and when separate actions are commenced the court may consolidate them and make all persons having claims filed parties to the action. Those claiming liens who fail or refuse to become parties plaintiff may be made parties defendant, and any one not made a party may at any time before the final hearing intervene.

